Utah statutes.
63H-5-109.   Duty to maintain rails and operating equipment.

The authority shall maintain the rails, bed, right-of-way, and related property owned by the authority upon which the authority's train operates in compliance with state and federal statutes, rules, and regulations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

